Utah statutes.
53-13-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Auxiliary officer" means a sworn, certified, and supervised special function officer, as described by Section 53-13-112.

(2)  "Certified" means recognized and accepted by the division as having successfully met and maintained the standards and training requirements set and approved by the director of the division with the advice and consent of the council.

(3)  "Collateral duty" means a duty to corroborate and support a peace officer function that is secondary and supplemental to the primary duty of the position.

(4)  "Council" means the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council created in Section 53-6-106.

(5)  "Director" means the director of the Peace Officer Standards and Training Division appointed under Section 53-6-104.

(6)  "Division" means the Peace Officer Standards and Training Division created in Section 53-6-103.

(7)  "Local law enforcement agency" means a law enforcement agency of any political subdivision of the state.

(8)  "Primary duties" means those duties which come first in degree of effort and importance.

(9)  "Principal duties" means those duties which are the highest and foremost in responsibility.

(10)  "Reserve officer" means a sworn and certified peace officer, whether paid or voluntary, who:

(a)  is serving in a reserve capacity for a law enforcement agency that is part of or administered by the state or any of its political subdivisions; and

(b)  meets the basic and in-service training requirements of the peace officer classification in which the officer will function.

(11)  "Spectrum" means that which encompasses the scope of authority.  "Full spectrum" encompasses total 24-hour authority; while anything less than full authority is contained or restricted within certain limits as set forth by statute, ordinance, policy, or rule.

(12)  "Sworn" means having taken the oath of office set forth in Utah Constitution Article IV, Section 10, administered by the law enforcement agency for whom a peace officer works.

(13)  "Volunteer" means an officer who donates service without pay or other compensation except expenses actually and reasonably incurred as approved by the supervising agency.

(14) (a)  "While on duty" means while an officer is actually performing the job duties and work activities assigned by the employing agency and for which the officer is trained and certified, and may include time spent outside those duties and activities if that additional time involves an activity that is an integral and necessary part of the job, and is spent for the benefit, and under the direction of, the employing agency.

(b)  "While on duty" does not include the time an officer spends commuting between the officer's home and place of employment unless that time involves an activity in Subsection (14)(a).

